Wyoming, session 2026, SF0059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-402 through 21-3-405 are created
to read:
ARTICLE 4
LANGUAGE AND LITERACY
21-3-402. Wyoming language and literacy program;
purpose.
(a) The Wyoming language and literacy program is
created.
(b) The purpose of this act is to ensure that every
student in kindergarten through grade twelve (12) develops
strong language and literacy skills by establishing a
comprehensive system of evidence based language and
literacy instruction, assessment, intervention and
professional development that supports educators, engages
families and promotes literacy proficiency for all Wyoming
students.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
21-3-403. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Department" means the state department of
education created pursuant to W.S. 21-2-104;
(ii) "Developmental language disorder" or "DLD"
means a primary language disorder that is not attributable
to a known biomedical condition and is characterized by
persistent difficulties learning, understanding or using
language that cause functional impairment in everyday
activities. The disorder may affect speaking, listening,
reading and writing, may co-occur with other
neurodevelopmental conditions and typically persists from
early childhood into adulthood;
(iii) "Diagnostic assessment" means a valid and
reliable specialized assessment used to evaluate specific
areas of language and literacy for students with reading
difficulties or at risk for poor reading outcomes and
provide data to inform individualized reading plans and
evidence based language and literacy instruction and
intervention;
(iv) "District language and literacy plan" or
"DLLP" means a school district's written comprehensive
strategy, including professional development, progress
monitoring and family engagement and intervention, to
identify students with reading difficulties and deliver
evidence based language and literacy instruction through a
multitiered system of support for students with reading
difficulties or at risk for poor reading outcomes;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(v) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning
disability neurobiological in origin, characterized by
difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and
by poor spelling and decoding abilities, typically
resulting from a deficit in the phonological component of
language and often unexpected in relation to other
cognitive abilities and the provision of effective
classroom instruction. Secondary consequences may include
problems in reading comprehension and reduced reading
experience that may impede growth of vocabulary and
background knowledge;
(vi) "Dyslexia screener" means a valid and
reliable brief assessment used to identify students who may
have characteristics associated with dyslexia and aligned
with evidence based language and literacy instruction. A
dyslexia screener does not diagnose dyslexia;
(vii) "Evidence based language and literacy
instruction" means explicit, systematic, cumulative and
diagnostic instruction grounded in the science of reading
that develops accurate and fluent word recognition and
language comprehension. Instruction includes, as
appropriate to developmental level, phonological and
phonemic awareness, sound–symbol association, decoding and
encoding, syllable structure, morphology, syntax,
semantics, vocabulary development, oral reading fluency,
background knowledge and discourse-level comprehension,
coordinated to support fluent word recognition, deep
comprehension and effective written expression;
(viii) "Grade level reading proficiency" means
as defined by the state superintendent and adopted in rule;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ix) "High quality instructional materials and
practices" means curriculum, instructional methods and
teaching tools aligned with evidence based language and
literacy instruction and supported by strong or moderate
evidence of effectiveness;
(x) "Individualized reading plan" or "IRP" means
a written plan developed for an individual student
identified as having reading difficulties or at risk for
poor reading outcomes that includes evidence based language
and literacy instruction and intervention, measurable goals
and progress monitoring;
(xi) "Literacy proficiency" means the ability to
read, write, speak and understand language with accuracy,
automaticity and effective expression in order to
comprehend and communicate across content areas. Literacy
proficiency includes reading fluency, which consists of
rate, accuracy and expression, and integration of
vocabulary knowledge, background knowledge and language
comprehension that support proficient reading and written
expression;
(xii) "Multitiered system of support" or "MTSS"
means a tiered framework that provides universal, targeted
and intensive levels of academic and behavioral support and
evidence based language and literacy instruction, and uses
screeners and diagnostic assessments, data-based decision
making and progress monitoring to improve outcomes for all
students;
(xiii) "Reading difficulties" means conditions
or patterns of learning that interfere with the development
of accurate and fluent word recognition, spelling or
comprehension, including but not limited to dyslexia and
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
developmental language disorder, as demonstrated by a
student's performance on a screener or diagnostic
assessment;
(xiv) "State superintendent" means the state
superintendent of public instruction;
(xv) "Three-cueing system" means any model of
teaching students to read based on meaning, structure and
syntax and visual cues;
(xvi) "Universal screener" means a valid and
reliable brief assessment used to identify students with
reading difficulties or at risk for poor reading outcomes
that is aligned with evidence based language and literacy
instruction.
21-3-404. School district language and literacy
plans; administration of screeners and diagnostic
assessments; multitiered system of support; individualized
reading plans.
(a) Each school district shall adopt and implement a
DLLP to ensure language and literacy competency and
literacy proficiency for students in kindergarten through
grade twelve (12). The DLLP shall, at a minimum:
(i) Use universal and dyslexia screeners and
diagnostic assessments to assess and identify students with
reading difficulties and students at risk for poor reading
outcomes. After administration of a screener or diagnostic
assessment, each school district shall provide the results
of the student's performance on the screener or assessment
administered pursuant to this paragraph to the student's
parent or guardian. Screeners and diagnostic assessments
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
shall be approved by the state superintendent pursuant to
W.S. 21-3-405(a)(i) and shall be administered as follows:
(A) A dyslexia screener, once each fall,
for all students in kindergarten through grade two (2);
(B) A universal screener, three (3) times
each school year, for all students in kindergarten through
grade three (3);
(C) A universal screener, once each school
year, for all students in grades four (4) through twelve
(12) who have not demonstrated grade level reading
proficiency, for any student transferring into an
elementary or secondary public school in the state and for
any student identified as not proficient or at risk for
poor reading outcomes through district procedures or recent
assessments;
(D) Diagnostic assessments as appropriate
for any student identified with a reading difficulty or at
risk for poor reading outcomes.
(ii) Use high quality instructional materials
and practices aligned with the science of reading to
deliver evidence based language and literacy instruction;
(iii) Deploy an MTSS that ensures comprehensive
and effective evidence based language and literacy
instruction and intervention to improve the literacy
proficiency of all students. The MTSS shall, at a minimum,
include:
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Tier I, to provide explicit and
systematic evidence based language and literacy instruction
for all students in kindergarten through grade twelve (12);
(B) Tier II, to provide supplemental
evidence based language and literacy instruction with
targeted assistance and ongoing progress monitoring for
students with reading difficulties;
(C) Tier III, to deliver intensive and
individualized evidence based language and literacy
instruction and intervention for students with significant
and persistent reading difficulties.
(iv) Implement an IRP for each student
identified as having reading difficulties or at risk for
poor reading outcomes. An individualized education program
(IEP) prepared for a student pursuant to the federal
Individuals with Disabilities in Education Act shall be
deemed an IRP for purposes of this paragraph. The IRP
shall:
(A) Specify evidence based language and
literacy instruction specific to the student's reading
difficulties;
(B) Identify measurable language, literacy
and reading goals and progress monitoring methods;
(C) Be integrated into the student's
educational record;
(D) Be developed in collaboration with the
student's parent or guardian and implemented within thirty
(30) calendar days after identification of a student with
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
reading difficulties or at risk for poor reading outcomes
pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection. The school
district shall notify the student's parent or guardian of
the student's progress quarterly during the applicable
school year.
(v) Prohibit the use of the three-cueing system
as the only basis for teaching word recognition or
decoding.
(b) Each school district with sixty percent (60%) or
more students not demonstrating grade level reading
proficiency, as defined by rule of the state
superintendent, shall offer summer literacy camps or
extended supports, including after school support and
tutoring, for all students in grades one (1) through three
(3) with an IRP. The instruction required pursuant to this
subsection shall consist of appropriate, evidence based
language and literacy instruction aligned with each
student's IRP and shall include age and district
appropriate hours additional instruction beyond that
delivered during the regular course of the school year.
(c) Each school district shall ensure any person
employed by the school district receives job embedded,
practice based and ongoing literacy related professional
development appropriate to their role and level of
responsibility. The minimum professional development shall
include opportunities for literacy coaching and leadership
development to support effective implementation of evidence
based language and literacy instruction. The hours and
content requirements shall be as defined by rule of the
state superintendent pursuant to W.S. 21-3-405(a)(ii).
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(d) Not later than August 15 each year, for the prior
school year, each school district shall report to the
department:
(i) The percentage of students not achieving
grade level reading proficiency;
(ii) The average growth, by grade, for the
lowest performing ten percent (10%) of students in relation
to grade level reading proficiency;
(iii) A list of the evidence based language and
literacy instruction and high quality instructional
materials and practices utilized by the school district;
(iv) The qualifications, as defined by rule of
the state superintendent, of any person employed by the
school district that delivers language and literacy
instruction to students.
21-3-405. Additional duties of the state
superintendent; rulemaking authority.
(a) The state superintendent shall, by rule:
(i) In consultation with school districts,
identify universal and dyslexia screeners, diagnostic
assessments, evidence based language and literacy
instruction and high quality instructional materials and
practices to be utilized by school districts. School
districts may request the state superintendent approve use
of alternatives not incorporated in rule in the manner and
form required by the state superintendent;
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) Establish professional development
requirements related to effective language and literacy
instruction for all teachers and instructional staff,
differentiated by their role, level of responsibility and
grade level in supporting literacy proficiency;
(iii) Define terms necessary for the
administration and implementation of this act, including
but not limited to, "grade level reading proficiency",
"qualifications", "significant and persistent reading
difficulties", the "science of reading", "progress
monitoring" and "at risk for poor reading outcomes";
(iv) Ensure school districts comply with the
requirements of this act through monitoring and providing
technical assistance to school districts. The rules shall
identify policies and procedures for imposition of
corrective action plans for school districts failing to
adhere to the requirements of this act.
(b) The state superintendent shall post the
information reported by school districts pursuant to W.S.
21-3-404(d) to the department's website.
(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
limit or prohibit the expenditure of federal funds or other
funds for the purposes of this article.
Section 2. W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxiii) is amended to
read:
21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxiii) Implement and administer the reading
screening and intervention Wyoming language and literacy
program for students in kindergarten through grade three
(3) twelve (12) as required by W.S. 21-3-401 21-3-402 et
seq.;
Section 3.
(a) The state superintendent of public instruction
may utilize resources as necessary to establish a literacy
division within the department of education and contract
for services to support the literacy division to administer
the Wyoming language and literacy program as created by
section 1 of this act. The literacy division shall:
(i) Maintain a list of approved universal and
dyslexia screeners, diagnostic assessments, evidence based
language and literacy instruction and high quality
instructional materials and practices and review requests
by school districts to utilize alternative screeners,
assessments, instructional material or high quality
instructional materials and practices;
(ii) Provide technical assistance to school
districts;
(iii) Support research efforts;
(iv) Publish data and reports collected pursuant
to W.S. 21-3-404(d);
(v) Monitor school districts' compliance with
the Wyoming language and literacy program, as created by
11

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0059
ENROLLED ACT NO. 43, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
section 1 of this act and take corrective action as
necessary.
Section 4. W.S. 21-3-401 is repealed.
Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
12